Utah statutes.
41-6a-1623.   Braking systems required -- Adoption of performance requirements by department.

(1)  A motor vehicle and a combination of vehicles shall have a service braking system which will stop the motor vehicle or combination of vehicles within:

(a)  40 feet from an initial speed of 20 miles per hour on a level, dry, smooth, hard surface; or

(b)  a shorter distance as may be specified by the department in accordance with federal standards.

(2)  A motor vehicle and a combination of vehicles shall have a parking brake system:

(a)  adequate to hold the motor vehicle or combination of vehicles on any grade on which it is operated under all conditions of loading on a surface free from snow, ice or loose material; or

(b)  which complies with performance standards issued by the department in accordance with federal standards.

(3)  In addition to the requirements of Subsections (1) and (2), if necessary for safe operation, the department may by rule require additional braking systems in accordance with federal standards.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

